District of Columbia statutes.
47-1013

Sheridan tapestries.

No personal taxes shall be levied against certain tapestries, which were presented to the late Lieutenant-General Philip H. Sheridan for gallant and meritorious services, and which were on exhibition in the National Museum on April 27, 1904, so long as they are exhibited in said Museum.

Apr. 27, 1904, 33 Stat. 364, ch. 1628
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1013.
1973 Ed., § 47-806.